Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 2. (1) Using student attendance data received from a school district  under ORS
327.133, the Department of Education  shall calculate the following for students who were
enrolled at the school district or a public charter school for a total of at least 10 days  during
the reporting period:
(a) The total number of students in average daily membership for the school district or
public charter school;
(b) The total number of students in average daily  membership who are regular attenders;
(c) The percentage of students who are regular attenders;
(d) The total number of students in average daily membership  who are chronically ab-
sent; and
(e) The percentage of students who are chronically absent.
(2)(a) Four times per calendar year, the department shall:
(A) Compile the data as provided by subsection (1) of this section;
(B) Provide each school district and public charter school at least 15 business  days to
review the compiled data and request adjustments be made to the  data, in the time and
manner provided by rule of the State Board of Education, before  the department makes the
data available to the public; and
(C) Make available to the public the compiled data on the department’s website  in an
easy-to-use format, including disaggregating the data by student group.
(b) When making the data available to the public, the department shall clearly describe:
(A) The requirements used for determining when a student is a regular attender or
chronically absent;
(B) Whether any changes have been made in the methodology for determining when  a
student is a regular attender or chronically absent; and
(C) Guidance on how the data should be  interpreted and used, including any limitations
of the data when making comparisons across school districts, schools  and reporting periods.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2026 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Enrolled House Bill 4154 (HB 4154-A) Page 1
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, the
State Board of Education and the  Department of Education may take any action before the
operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary for the department
and board to exercise, on and  after the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and power conferred upon the department and board by
section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The reporting requirements and the data compilation requirements of
section 2 of this 2026 Act first apply to the 2026-2027 school year.
(2) The Department of Education  shall include on the department’s website a clear de-
scription of  the changes that have been made in the methodology for determining when a
student is a regular attender or chronically absent for the 2026-2027  school year in compar-
ison to the methodology used in making that determination for the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 18, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4154 (HB 4154-A) Page 2